Tennessee, session 114, HB2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-64-302, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a)
(1) Venue for a proceeding by the attorney general and reporter to
dissolve a corporation lies:
(A) In any county where the corporation's principal office is
located or, if the corporation does not have a principal office located in
this state, the corporation's registered office;
(B) Where the corporation has engaged in any activity, including
soliciting donations or doing business;
(C) Where the attorney general and reporter has an office; or
(D) Davidson County, Sumner County, or Williamson County.
(2) Venue for a proceeding brought by another party named in § 48-64-
301 other than the attorney general and reporter lies in the county where the
corporation's principal office is or was last located, or, if the corporation does not
have or has not had a principal office located in this state, the corporation's
registered office.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2019
010499
- 1 -